Utah statutes.
35A-8-1006.   Evaluations -- Reports.

(1)  The office shall periodically evaluate grantees of Community Services Block Grant funds as established by rule by the division in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.

(2)  A grantee of Community Services Block Grant funds shall submit to the office a year-end report, covering a reporting period consistent with the federal fiscal year, which provides an account of the grantee's programs operated with or supported by Community Services Block Grant funds, including:

(a)  the types of programs operated by the grantee;

(b)  the outcome of each program;

(c)  the number of persons served by each program;

(d)  the number of times service was given by each program; and

(e)  an accounting of the Community Services Block Grant funds expended by the grantee.

(3)  The office shall report annually to the appropriate legislative appropriations subcommittee on the distribution and expenditure of Community Services Block Grant funds.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 212, 2012 General Session

